Arkansas, session 2025, HB1492.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 15, Subchapter 13, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
6-15-1306. Mobile panic alert system — Required.
(a)(1) Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, each public school
district board of directors and open-enrollment public charter school
governing authority shall implement a mobile panic alert system that is
capable of connecting diverse emergency services technologies to ensure real-
time coordination between multiple first responder agencies.
(2) The mobile panic alert system required by this section shall
integrate with local public safety answering point infrastructure to transmit
9-1-1 calls and mobile activations.
(b) A public school district board of directors or an open-enrollment
public charter school governing authority may implement additional strategies
or systems to ensure real-time coordination between multiple first responder
agencies in a school security emergency in addition to the mobile panic alert
*TNL115*
03-19-2025 15:22:03 TNL115

As Engrossed: H3/4/25 H3/19/25 HB1492
system required by this section.
(c) Each public school district board of directors and open-enrollment
public charter school governing authority shall establish a schedule to test
the functionality and coverage capacity of all emergency communication
systems, including the mobile panic alert system required by this section, to
determine if adequate signal strength is available in all areas of the public
school district's or open-enrollment public school's campus.
(d) This section does not apply to a statewide open-enrollment public
charter school that operates primarily as a virtual school.
(e) The Department of Education may adopt rules to implement this
section.

/s/Gramlich























03-19-2025 15:22:03 TNL115